Hawaii statutes.
[§663-10.6] Exemption for providing shelter
and subsistence to the needy. (a) Any charitable or nonprofit
organization that in good faith provides shelter or proper means of subsistence
to needy persons as part of its bona fide and customary charitable activities,
rendered without remuneration or expectation of remuneration, shall be exempt
from civil liability for injuries and damages resulting from the organization's
acts or omissions in providing such shelter or subsistence, except for gross
negligence or wanton acts or omissions of the organization.

(b) Any person who donates goods, food,
materials, or services to a charitable or nonprofit organization described in
subsection (a) shall be exempt from civil liability for injuries and damages
resulting from the donation, except for gross negligence or wanton acts or
omissions.

(c) As used in this section, "needy
person" means any person who lacks adequate or proper means of
subsistence. [L 1994, c 250, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next